District of Columbia statutes.
47-398.06

Rule of construction regarding revenue bond requirements under Home Rule Act.

Nothing in the District of Columbia Convention Center and Sports Arena Authorization Act of 1995 may be construed to affect the application of section 490 of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act [§ 1-204.90] to any revenue bonds, notes, or other obligations issued by the Council of the District of Columbia or by any District instrumentality to which the Council delegates its authority to issue revenue bonds, notes, or other obligations under such section.

Aug. 12, 1998, 112 Stat. 1515, Pub. L. 105-227, § 1(b)
1981 Ed., § 47-398.6.
The District of Columbia Convention Center and Sports Arena Authorization Act of 1995, referred to in this section, is Public Law 104-28.